fi: Sopraanosaksofonin suukappaleen kammion koko: Suuri; Keskikokoinen; Pieni; Muu
lt-LT: Sopraninio saksofono kandiklio kameros dydis: Didelė; Vidutinė; Maža; Kita
ru: Размер камеры мундштука сопрано саксофона: Большая; Средняя; Маленькая; Другое
it: Taglia della camera del bocchino del sassofono soprano: Grande; Media; Piccola; Altra
sl-SI: Velikost komore ustnika sopranskega saksofona: Veliko; Srednje; Majhno; Drugo
bg-BG: Размер на камерата на мундщук за сопран саксофон: Голяма; Средна; Малка; Друго
nl: Kamergrootte van mondstuk sopraansaxofoon: Groot; Medium; Klein; Anders
cs: Velikost komory náustku sopránového saxofonu: Velká; Střední; Malá; Jiné
hu: Szoprán szaxofon fúvóka kamramérete: Nagy; Közepes; Kicsi; Egyéb
sv: Storlek på munstycket för sopransaxofon: Stor; Medium; Liten; Övrigt
es: Tamaño de la cámara de la boquilla para saxofón soprano: Grande; Mediana; Pequeña; Otro
pt-BR: Saxofone soprano, tamanho da câmara da boquilha: Grande; Médio; Pequeno; Outro
hr-HR: Veličina komore usnika sopran saksofona: Velika; Srednja; Mala; Ostalo
da: Kammerstørrelse for sopransaxofonmundstykke: Stor; Medium; Lille; Andet
nb: Kammerstørrelse for munnstykke til sopransaksofon: Stor; Middels; Liten; Annet
zh-CN: 高音萨克斯笛头腔体尺寸: 大; 中; 小; 其他
th: ขนาดโพรงด้านในของปากเป่าแซกโซโฟนโซปราโน: ใหญ่; กลาง; เล็ก; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Dimensiune a camerei muștiucului pentru saxofon soprano: Mare; Mediu; Mic; Altele
el: Μέγεθος θαλάμου επιστομίου για σοπράνο σαξόφωνο: Μεγάλο; Μεσαίο; Μικρό; Άλλο
zh-TW: 高音薩克斯風吹嘴內膛尺寸: 大; 中; 小; 其他
sk-SK: Veľkosť komory náustku pre sopránový saxofón: Veľká; Stredná; Malá; Iná
pt-PT: Tamanho da câmara da boquilha do saxofone soprano: Grande; Médio; Pequeno; Outro
ko: 소프라노 색소폰 마우스피스 체임버 크기: 대형; 중형; 소형; 기타
de: Größe der Kammer des Sopransaxophon-Mundstücks: Groß; Mittel; Klein; Andere
en: Soprano saxophone mouthpiece chamber size: Large; Medium; Small; Other
fr: Volume de la chambre d'un bec de saxophone soprano: Grande; Moyenne; Petite; Autre
vi: Kích thước buồng âm trong ống thổi của kèn Soprano Saxophone: Lớn; Vừa; Nhỏ; Khác
pl: Rozmiar komory ustnika saksofonu sopranowego: Duża; Średnia; Mała; Inny
tr: Soprano saksafon ağızlık hazne boyutu: Büyük; Orta; Küçük; Diğer
ja: ソプラノサクソフォンマウスピースチャンバータイプ: ラージ; ミディアム; スモール; その他